District of Columbia statutes.
9-601

Removal from sidewalks by owner of abutting property.

(a)

The owner of a residential or commercial property that fronts or abuts a paved sidewalk shall, within the first 8 hours of daylight after the ceasing to fall of any snow or sleet, remove and clear away, or cause to be removed and cleared away, snow or sleet that is in front of or abuts a building or lot of land to provide a path that is the entire width of the sidewalk, up to 36 inches wide; provided, that a residential or commercial property owner may delegate this responsibility to a tenant, occupant, lessee, or other individual by written agreement.

(b)

If snow or sleet cannot be removed without causing injury to the paved sidewalk, then the owner of the residential or commercial property shall, within the first 8 hours of daylight after the ceasing to fall of any snow or sleet, make the sidewalk reasonably safe for travel by covering the unremoved snow or sleet with a coating of sand, sawdust, or other proper substance as necessary to render the sidewalk safe for pedestrian travel.

History

Sept. 16, 1922, 42 Stat. 845, ch. 318, § 1
Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-211, § 2(a), 61 DCR 13074

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-901.
1973 Ed., § 7-801.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-211 rewrote the section.